Utah statutes.
13-11a-5.   Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to:

(1)  conduct in compliance with the orders or rules of, or a statute administered by, a federal, state, or local governmental agency;

(2)  publishers, broadcasters, printers, or other persons engaged in the dissemination of information or reproduction of printed or pictorial matters who publish, broadcast, or reproduce material without knowledge of its deceptive character; or

(3)  actions or appeals pending on the effective date of this chapter.

